Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-259.06
School lands; adjacent to city of the first or second class; dedication of streets and alleys.

The filing of such plat and proceedings in the office of the register of deeds shall constitute a dedication of the streets and alleys contained therein so long as the same shall be used for such public purposes.

Laws 1953, c. 259, § 6, p. 869.